Maryland, session 2025, SB0898.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
8–706.
(a) To maximize participation in the Conservation Reserve Enhancement
Program[, in]:
(1) IN fiscal years [2023] 2026 through 2031, inclusive, a landowner who
enrolls land planted with a forested streamside buffer shall receive a one–time signing
bonus of up to [$1,000] $1,250 per acre of land enrolled;
(2) IN FISCAL YEARS 2026 THROUGH 2031, INCLUSIVE, A
LANDOWNER WHO ENROLLS LAND PLANTED WITH A FIXED NATURAL BUFFER UNDER
§ 8–707 OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL RECEIVE A ONE–TIME SIGNING BONUS OF UP TO
$1,500 PER ACRE OF QUALIFYING LAND ENROLLED; AND
(3) IN FISCAL YEARS 2026 THROUGH 2031, INCLUSIVE, AN
AGRICULTURAL OPERATION, INCLUDING LEASED LAND OPERATORS, WITH LAND
THAT IS LOCATED WITHIN THE CRITICAL AREA AND ENROLLED IN A FIXED NATURAL
BUFFER PROGRAM UNDER § 8–707 OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL RECEIVE AN ANNUAL
PAYMENT OF AT LEAST $150 PER ACRE OF PROJECT AREA.
(b) Signing bonuses provided under this section shall be funded with:
(1) Money appropriated under subsection (c) of this section; and
(2) The amount specified in § 9–1605.2(i)(11)(i) of the Environment Article.
(c) (1) For fiscal years 2024 through 2031, in each year the Governor shall
appropriate $2,500,000 in the annual State budget to fund FIXED NATURAL BUFFERS
UNDER § 8–707 OF THIS SUBTITLE, tree planting under this section, and other tree
planting programs on agricultural land.
(2) Money appropriated under this subsection is supplemental to and may
not take the place of funding that would otherwise be appropriated for FIXED NATURAL
BUFFERS UNDER § 8–707 OF THIS SUBTITLE, tree plantings under this section, and
other tree planting programs on agricultural land.

SENATE BILL 898 3
8–707.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “FIXED NATURAL BUFFER” MEANS A STRIP OF MAINTAINED,
NATIVE VEGETATION ALONGSIDE A BODY OF WATER.
(II) “FIXED NATURAL BUFFER” INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING
FIXED NATURAL FILTER PRACTICES:
1. THE PLANTING OF RIPARIAN FOREST BUFFERS;
2. THE PLANTING OF RIPARIAN HERBACEOUS COVER;
3. TREE PLANTINGS THAT ARE ON AGRICULTURAL
LAND; AND
4. WETLAND RESTORATION.
(III) “FIXED NATURAL BUFFER” DOES NOT INCLUDE PASTURE
MANAGEMENT, AS DESCRIBED UNDER § 8–701(D)(5) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) “100–FOOT TIDAL BUFFER” MEANS ANY LAND WITHIN 100 FEET
OF:
(I) THE MEAN HIGH WATER LINE OF TIDAL WATERS;
(II) THE EDGE OF EACH BANK OF A TRIBUTARY TIDAL STREAM;
OR
(III) THE LANDWARD BOUNDARY OF A TIDAL WETLAND.
(B) IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE TECHNICAL SPECIFICATIONS ADOPTED BY
THE DEPARTMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, STATE COST–SHARE
FUNDING MAY BE MADE AVAILABLE TO A PERSON FOR INSTALLING A FIXED
NATURAL BUFFER WITHIN THE 100–FOOT TIDAL BUFFER ON AN AGRICULTURAL
OPERATION IF THE PERSON ENTERS INTO A COST–SHARE AGREEMENT WITH THE
DEPARTMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 8–704 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2025, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT
TECHNICAL SPECIFICATIONS FOR A FIXED NATURAL BUFFER PRACTICE TO BE
ELIGIBLE FOR COST–SHARE FUNDING UNDER THIS SECTION.

SENATE BILL 898
(2) THE SPECIFICATIONS ADOPTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE A REQUIREMENT THAT THE FIXED NATURAL BUFFER
FILLS THE ENTIRE WIDTH OF THE 100–FOOT TIDAL BUFFER.
(D) (1) AN AGRICULTURAL OPERATOR WHO MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS
UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION IS ELIGIBLE FOR:
(I) REIMBURSEMENT OF UP TO 150% OF ELIGIBLE COSTS
TOWARD THE INSTALLATION OF THE ELIGIBLE FIXED NATURAL BUFFER;
(II) AN UP–FRONT BONUS PAYMENT AWARDED PER ACRE OF
ELIGIBLE LAND COVERED BY THE FIXED NATURAL BUFFER ASSESSED AT A TIERED
RATE DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (2) OF
THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(III) AN ANNUAL BONUS PAYMENT PER ACRE OF ELIGIBLE LAND
THAT REMAINS COVERED BY THE FIXED NATURAL BUFFER ASSESSED AT A
STATEWIDE FLAT RATE OF NOT LESS THAN $150 PER ACRE IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
8–706(A)(3) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) (I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP A TIERED SYSTEM TO
ASSESS THE PER–ACRE RATE OF BONUS PAYMENTS FOR A NEWLY INSTALLED FIXED
NATURAL BUFFER UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION, BASED ON:
1. THE TYPE OF BEST MANAGEMENT PRACTICE
IMPLEMENTED, ASSIGNING HIGHER VALUE TO RIPARIAN TREE BUFFERS;
2. THE ELEVATION OF THE PROJECT;
3. THE SLOPE OF THE LAND WITHIN THE 100–FOOT
TIDAL BUFFER; AND
4. THE EXTENT OF ANY HYDRIC SOILS OR WETLANDS IN
THE BUFFER.
(II) THE BONUS PAYMENTS MAY NOT BE LESS THAN $1,000 PER
ACRE OR NOT MORE THAN $4,000 PER ACRE.
8–803.10.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.

SENATE BILL 898 5
(2) “AGRICULTURAL OPERATION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
8–8A–01 OF THIS TITLE.
(3) “FERTILIZER” MEANS ANY COMMERCIAL FERTILIZER, MANURE,
SLUDGE, SOIL CONDITIONER, OR OTHER SUBSTANCE CONTAINING A RECOGNIZED
PLANT NUTRIENT USED FOR ITS PLANT NUTRIENT CONTENT AND DESIGNED FOR
USE TOWARD, OR CLAIMED TO HAVE VALUE IN, PROMOTING PLANT GROWTH.
(B) A NUTRIENT MANAGEMENT PLAN RENEWED ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2025,
MAY NOT ALLOW A PERSON ON AN AGRICULTURAL OPERATION TO APPLY
FERTILIZER TO ANY LAND WITHIN 100 FEET OF:
(1) THE MEAN HIGH WATER LINE OF TIDAL WATERS;
(2) THE EDGE OF EACH BANK OF A TRIBUTARY TIDAL STREAM; OR
(3) THE LANDWARD BOUNDARY OF A TIDAL WETLAND.
8–8A–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Agricultural operation” means each physical site where a person engages in
a business that:
(1) Grows, raises, keeps, pastures, or otherwise produces a farm product,
including:
(i) Any agricultural, horticultural, vegetable, or fruit product of the
soil; or
(ii) Livestock, poultry, eggs, dairy products, nuts, honey, and every
product of a farm, a forest, or an orchard; and
(2) Has:
(i) A gross annual income of $2,500 or more; or
(ii) Eight or more animal units.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.